Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-117.01
Terms, defined.

As used in section 81-117, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Employee shall mean an employee of any state agency, department, commission, board, or office, except (a) state employees who hold a publicly elected office of the State of Nebraska, (b) state employees who serve as a chief administrative officer for a state agency, department, commission, board, or office, and (c) all academic personnel of the University of Nebraska and the state colleges;

(2) Department shall mean and include any state agency, department, commission, board, or office, specifically including the University of Nebraska and the state colleges; and

(3) Overtime pay is computed on the basis of hours worked.

Laws 1977, LB 88, § 1.